Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.645

Petition for guardianship for minor.

This form may be used to petition for guardianship for a minor.

Petition for Guardianship for Minor

State of:. . . .

County of:. . . .

Name and address of attorney representing petitioner, if applicable:. . . .

. . . .

. . . .

Note to petitioner: This form can be used to petition for a guardian for a minor. A court may appoint a guardian for a minor who does not have a guardian if the court finds the appointment is in the minor's best interest, and: The parents, after being fully informed of the nature and consequences of guardianship, consent; all parental rights have been terminated; or the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the parents are unwilling or unable to exercise their parental rights.

(1) Information about the person filing this petition (the petitioner.)

(a) Name:. . . .

(b) Principal residence:. . . .

(c) Current street address (if different):. . . .

(d) Relationship to minor:. . . .

(e) Interest in this petition:. . . .

(f) Telephone number (optional):. . . .

(g) Email address (optional):. . . .

(2) Information about the minor alleged to need a guardian. Provide the following information to the extent known.

(a) Name:. . . .

(b) Age:. . . .

(c) Principal residence:. . . .

(d) Current street address (if different):. . . .

(e) If petitioner anticipates the minor moving, or seeks to move the minor, proposed new address:. . . .

(f) Does the minor need an interpreter, translator, or other form of support to communicate with the court or understand court proceedings? If so, please explain:. . . .

(g) Telephone number (optional):. . . .

(h) Email address (optional):. . . .

(3) Information about the minor's parent(s).

(a) Name(s) of living parent(s):. . . .

(b) Current street address(es) of living parent(s):. . . .

(c) Does any parent need an interpreter, translator, or other form of support to communicate with the court or understand court proceedings? If so, please explain:. . . .

. . . .

. . . .

(4) People who are required to be notified of this petition. State the name and current address of the people listed in Appendix A.

. . . .

. . . .

(5) Appointment requested. State the name and address of any proposed guardian and the reason the proposed guardian should be selected.

. . . .

. . . .

(6) State why petitioner seeks the appointment. Include a description of the nature and extent of the minor's alleged need.

. . . .

. . . .

(7) Property. If the minor has property other than personal effects, state the minor's property with an estimate of its value.

. . . .

. . . .

(8) Other proceedings. If there are any other proceedings concerning the care or custody of the minor currently pending in any court in this state or another jurisdiction, please describe them.

. . . .

. . . .

(9) Attorney(s). If the minor or the minor's parent is represented by an attorney in this matter, state the name, telephone number, email address, and address of the attorney(s).

. . . .

. . . .

SIGNATURE

. . . . . . . . . .

Signature of Petitioner Date

. . . . . . . . . .

Signature of Petitioner's Attorney if Date

Petitioner is Represented by Counsel

APPENDIX A:

People whose name and address must be listed in subsection (4) of this petition if they are not the petitioner:

The minor, if the minor is twelve years of age or older;

Each parent of the minor or, if there are none, the adult nearest in kinship that can be found;

An adult with whom the minor resides;

Each person that had primary care or custody of the minor for at least sixty days during the two years immediately before the filing of the petition or for at least seven hundred thirty days during the five years immediately before the filing of the petition;

If the minor is twelve years of age or older, any person nominated as guardian by the minor;

Any person nominated as guardian by a parent of the minor;

The grandparents of the minor;

Adult siblings of the minor; and

Any current guardian or conservator for the minor appointed in this state or another jurisdiction.

[ 2019 c 437 s 602.]